Odia_apertium_morph_dict.dix
<pardef n="Gar/a__n">
<e><p><l>ati</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:ti"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>atA</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:tA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ate</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:te"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>atie</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:tie"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>atAe</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:tAe"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>atiku</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:ku"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:ti"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>atira</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:ra"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:ti"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>atire</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:re"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:ti"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>agudika</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>agudiku</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>agudikara</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:ra"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>agudikare</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:re"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>agudZika</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>agudZiku</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>agudZikara</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:ra"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>agudZikare</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:re"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>aku</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:ku"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ara</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:ra"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>agudAka</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>agudAku</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>agudAkare</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:re"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>agudAkaru</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:ru"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>agudAkara</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:ra"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>agudA</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>agudAka</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>agudZAku</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>agudZAkare</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:re"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>agudZAkaru</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:ru"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>agudZAkara</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:ra"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>agudZA</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>atAku</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:ku"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:tA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>atAre</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:re"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:tA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>u</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="lok/a__n">
<e><p><l>ati</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:ti"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>atA</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:tA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ate</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:te"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>atie</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:tie"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>atAe</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:tAe"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>amAne</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>amAnafku</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:fku"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>aku</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:ku"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>amAnafka</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:fka"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>amAnafkara</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:fkara"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>atiku</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:ku"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:ti"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>atira</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:ra"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:ti"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ra</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:ra"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>agudika</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>agudikara</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:ra"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>agudifku</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:fku"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>agudiku</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:ku"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>agudZika</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>agudZikara</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:ra"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>agudZifku</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:fku"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>agudZiku</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:ku"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>afka</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:fka"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>afku</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>afkara</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:fkara"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>agudA</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>agudZA</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>atAku</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:ku"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:tA"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="GqNA/__n">
<e><p><l>re</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:re"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ra</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:ra"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ru</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:ru"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ku</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:ku"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="Gara"><i>Gar</i><par n="Gar/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="aBAgya"><i>aBAgya</i><par n="GqNA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="aBiGAwa"><i>aBiGAwa</i><par n="GqNA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="aBiprAya"><i>aBiprAya</i><par n="GqNA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="aBimawa"><i>aBimawa</i><par n="GqNA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="AdaMbara"><i>AdaMbara</i><par n="GqNA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="agnikaNa"><i>agnikaNa</i><par n="GqNA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="ahiMsA"><i>ahiMsA</i><par n="GqNA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="aKaMdana"><i>aKaMdana</i><par n="GqNA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="AKyAyikA"><i>AKyAyikA</i><par n="GqNA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="anAhAra"><i>anAhAra</i><par n="GqNA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="anuBaba"><i>anuBaba</i><par n="GqNA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="anupAwa"><i>anupAwa</i><par n="GqNA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="anusaraNa"><i>anusaraNa</i><par n="GqNA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="apaGAwa"><i>apaGAwa</i><par n="GqNA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="Apawwi"><i>Apawwi</i><par n="GqNA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="Arogya"><i>Arogya</i><par n="GqNA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="Bakwi"><i>Bakwi</i><par n="GqNA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="BAvoxaya"><i>BAvoxaya</i><par n="GqNA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="BinnawA"><i>BinnawA</i><par n="GqNA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="buxXawba"><i>buxXawba</i><par n="GqNA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="carcA"><i>carcA</i><par n="GqNA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="gaMda"><i>gaMda</i><par n="GqNA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="hawyA"><i>hawyA</i><par n="GqNA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="irAka"><i>irAka</i><par n="GqNA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="jAgqwi"><i>jAgqwi</i><par n="GqNA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="janma"><i>janma</i><par n="GqNA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="kAmanA"><i>kAmanA</i><par n="GqNA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="keSa"><i>keSa</i><par n="GqNA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="lakRaNa"><i>lakRaN</i><par n="GqNA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="lokasaBA"><i>lokasaBA</i><par n="GqNA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="mahApUjA"><i>mahApUjA</i><par n="GqNA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="majAka"><i>majAka</i><par n="GqNA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="meGa"><i>meGa</i><par n="GqNA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="nAcaGara"><i>nAcaGar</i><par n="Gar/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="naMxiGoRa"><i>naMxiGoRa</i><par n="GqNA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="abiSbAsa"><i>abiSbAsa</i><par n="GqNA/__n"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="academical"><p><l>academical</l><r>academic</r></p><par n="GqNA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="aduA"><i>aduA</i><par n="GqNA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="anaSana"><i>anaSana</i><par n="GqNA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="aPisara"><i>aPisara</i><par n="GqNA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="aXibeSana"><i>aXibeSana</i><par n="GqNA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="banyA"><i>banyA</i><par n="GqNA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="bicCexa"><i>bicCexa</i><par n="GqNA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="biSbaprema"><i>biSbaprema</i><par n="GqNA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="byabahAra"><i>byabahAra</i><par n="GqNA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="kabirAja"><i>kabirAja</i><par n="lok/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="kada"><i>kad</i><par n="Gar/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="aBijAwya"><i>aBijAwya</i><par n="GqNA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="kAna"><i>kAn</i><par n="Gar/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="kanxA"><i>kanx</i><par n="Gar/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="kataka"><i>kataka</i><par n="GqNA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="kRawi"><i>kRawi</i><par n="GqNA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="kuNiAzGara"><i>kuNiAzGar</i><par n="Gar/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="lALasA"><i>lALasA</i><par n="GqNA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="maxa"><i>maxa</i><par n="GqNA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="muNdiA"><i>muNdiA</i><par n="GqNA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="nUAGara"><i>nUAGar</i><par n="Gar/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="nyAya"><i>nyAya</i><par n="GqNA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="pAga"><i>pAga</i><par n="GqNA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="prasAra"><i>prasAra</i><par n="GqNA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="pUrba"><i>pUrba</i><par n="GqNA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="rajAGara"><i>rajAGar</i><par n="Gar/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="safKALi"><i>safKALi</i><par n="GqNA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="SAnwi"><i>SAnwi</i><par n="GqNA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="SeRa"><i>SeRa</i><par n="GqNA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="waLa"><i>waL</i><par n="Gar/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="Biwara"><i>Biwar</i><par n="Gar/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="SraxXA"><i>SraxXA</i><par n="GqNA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="sWaLa"><i>sWaL</i><par n="Gar/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="TAkura"><i>TAkur</i><par n="lok/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="ujANi"><i>ujANi</i><par n="GqNA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="uxArawA"><i>uxArawA</i><par n="GqNA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="xakRawA"><i>xakRawA</i><par n="GqNA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="XamAXama"><i>XamAXama</i><par n="Gar/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="xaSaxina"><i>xaSaxina</i><par n="Gar/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="xbAraxeSa"><i>xbAraxeSa</i><par n="Gar/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="xEbayoga"><i>xEbayoga</i><par n="GqNA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="xina"><i>xin</i><par n="Gar/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="xuAra"><i>xuAr</i><par n="Gar/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="XXAna"><i>XXAna</i><par n="GqNA/__n"/></e>
